Utah statutes.
10-3-1002.   Classified civil service -- Places of employment constituting
classified civil service -- Appointments to and from classified civil service.
(1)  The classified civil service shall consist of all places of employment
now existing or hereafter created in or under the police department and the
fire department of each first or second class city that establishes a civil
service commission and the health department in each first class city that
establishes a civil service commission, except the head of the departments,
deputy chiefs of the police and fire departments, and assistant chiefs of the
police department in cities of the first and second class, and the members of
the board of health of the departments.
(2)  No appointments to any of the places of employment constituting the
classified civil service in the departments shall be made except according to
law and under the rules and regulations of the civil service commission.
(3)  The head of each of the departments may, and the deputy chiefs of the
police and fire departments and assistant chiefs of the police department
shall, be appointed from the classified civil service, and upon the expiration
of the term or upon the appointment of a successor shall be returned thereto.
